Hawaii statutes.
§842-6 Enjoining other business operations.
The attorney general may institute civil proceedings in the circuit court to
enjoin the operation of any business other than a corporation, including a
partnership, limited partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, or
sole proprietorship, when:

(1) Any person in control of the business, who may be
a partner in a partnership or in a limited partnership, a participant in a
joint venture, the owner of a sole proprietorship, an employee or agent of any
such business, or a person who, in fact, exercises control over the operations
of the business in conducting business affairs, purposely engages in a
persistent course of organized crime with the intent to compel or induce other
persons, firms, or corporations to deal with the business or engage in
organized crime; and

(2) The public interest requires the operation of the
business to be enjoined, for the prevention of future illegal conduct of the
same character. [L 1972, c 71, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next